Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5883.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 127. (1) The portion of highway M-28 in Baraga County between Ford Road and Pirkola Road shall be known as the "Sgt. Fabian T. Godell Memorial Highway". (2) The sign designating the Sgt. Fabian T. Godell Memorial Highway may also state both of the following: (a) "Silver Star". (b) "World War II".